Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 698.1, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 249, O.S.L. 2023 (70 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 698.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 698.1. A. 1. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education shall establish and maintain an incentive scholarship
program and teacher employment incentive program, as funding is
available, to encourage the preparation of public school teachers
for prekindergarten through twelfth grade, including minority
teachers, at all state public higher education institutions or
Req. No. 11708 Page 1

priv ate higher education institutions accredited pursuant to Section
4103 of this title and incentivize employment as public teachers for
prekindergarten through twelfth grade in the state for at least five
(5) years, to be known as the Inspired to Teach Program.
Prospective teachers planning to pursue an undergraduate teacher
education program at an accredited Oklahoma teacher preparation
program shall be considered if they graduated from high school,
completed high-school level instruction at home, or completed
General Educational Development (GED) test requirements; meet the
higher education admission standards; and declare a pre-education
major or major in an approved Oklahoma teacher preparation degree
program leading to a standard teaching certificate.
B. 2. To the extent that funds are available, scholarships,
renewable for up to three (3) additional years for qualified
students meeting satisfactory academic progress standards in
completing a teacher preparation degree program leading to a
standard teaching certificate, shall be awarded to cover costs of
tuition, general enrollment fees, other fees, books, materials, and
services provided by the institution, including room and board, in
the following manner:
1.
a. One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per academic year for
up to three (3) academic years for full-time students

Req. No. 11708 Page 2

who have earned less than ninety (90) credit hours;
and
2.
b. Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) for the
final academic year for full-time students who have
earned ninety (90) or more credit hours.
The maximum amount of scholarship funds awarded as provided in
this subsection to any qualified student shall not exceed Five
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($5,500.00).
B. 1. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall
establish and maintain an incentive scholarship program and
incentive program, as funding is available, to encourage the
advanced education of public school counselors, speech pathologists,
special education teachers, and school administrators, at all state
public higher education institutions or private higher education
institutions accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of this title and
incentivize employment as public school employees for at least five
(5) years, to be included in the Inspired to Teach Program.
Prospective school counselors, speech pathologists, special
education teachers, and school administrators planning to pursue a
graduate degree in school counseling, speech pathology, special
education, or school administration at an accredited Oklahoma
graduate degree program shall be considered if they:
a. have an undergraduate degree,
Req. No. 11708 Page 3

b. meet the higher education admission standards for the
graduate degree program, and
c. declare a major in an approved Oklahoma graduate
degree program for school counseling, speech
pathology, special education, or school
administration.
2. To the extent that funds are available, scholarships,
renewable for up to two (2) additional years for qualified students
meeting satisfactory academic progress standards in completing a
graduate degree program, shall be awarded to cover costs of tuition,
general enrollment fees, other fees, books, materials, and services
provided by the institution, including room and board, in the
following manner:
a. One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per academic year for
up to two (2) academic years for full-time students
who have earned less than ninety (90) credit hours,
and
b. Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) for the
final academic year for full-time students who have
earned ninety (90) or more credit hours.
The maximum amount of scholarship funds awarded as provided in
this subsection to any qualified student shall not exceed Five
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($4,500.00).
C. As used in this section, "full-time student" means:
Req. No. 11708 Page 4

1. An undergraduate student enrolled in twelve (12) or more
semester credits toward teacher education degree requirements;
2. An undergraduate student who is a teacher education major
who is enrolled in or has completed an internship or student
teaching credit hours in order to complete the degree program prior
to certification and who has been approved to take less than twelve
(12) credit hours; or
3. An undergraduate student who is a teacher education major
with an approved reasonable accommodation from Student Accessibility
Services at the institution due to a documented disability and who
has been approved to take less than twelve (12) credit hours; or
4. A graduate student enrolled in nine (9) or more semester
credits toward graduate degree requirements.
D. It is the intent of the Oklahoma Legislature that the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education create a committee
composed of educators, teacher educators from the participating
institutions, and representatives of the public schools and the
State Department of Education to provide recommendations to the
State Regents to improve effectiveness of the Inspired to Teach
Program. The committee shall prepare and deliver a report on the
program to the Legislature on or before July 1 of each year.
E. Each scholarship participant, prior to entry into the
Inspired to Teach Program, shall have agreed to teach be employed in
an Oklahoma public prekindergarten through twelfth grade school for
Req. No. 11708 Page 5

a mi nimum of five (5) consecutive years upon either graduation and
licensure as a teacher or graduation with a graduate degree in
school counseling, speech pathology, special education, or school
administration. Any scholarship participant failing to maintain a
2.5 grade point average throughout matriculation, changing to an
ineligible area of study, failing to meet satisfactory academic
progress standards, withdrawing or otherwise leaving school, or
failing to meet requirements for licensure and certification to
teach as established by law shall be subject to disqualification
from the program.
F. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education are
authorized to make employment incentive payments pursuant to the
provisions of this section to Inspired to Teach Program participants
who are employed as traditionally certified teachers in Oklahoma
public prekindergarten through twelfth grade schools following
graduation or who are employed as school counselors, speech
pathologists, special education teachers, or school administrators.
Incentive payments may be awarded following each consecutive year of
satisfactory service as documented by the employing school district,
up to five (5) years of service for scholarship recipients as
provided in subsection subsections A and B of this section, upon
graduation from an accredited Oklahoma teacher preparation degree
program. The maximum amount of employment incentive payments for
any qualified participant shall be Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00)
Req. No. 11708 Page 6

per year for up to five (5) years, not to exceed a total of Twenty
Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00) per participant.
G. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall
require the execution of appropriate contracts with eligible
Inspired to Teach Program participants. Participants failing to
comply with the requirements of this section or failing to provide
current contact information shall not be eligible for the employment
incentive payments provided for in this section. The Chancellor of
the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education, with the approval
of the State Regents, may contract with any other appropriate
organization or unit of government for the administration of the
provisions of this section.
H. If sufficient funds are not available for employment
incentive payments to qualified participants during any fiscal year,
the Chancellor may make reductions in the payments made to qualified
participants.
I. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education may, at the
time an award is made on behalf of the Inspired to Teach Program,
set aside funds for the full commitment made to an eligible student.
J. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education may utilize
Inspired to Teach Program designated funds for administration of the
program.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.

Req. No. 11708 Page 7

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-11708 AQH 12/13/24



















Req. No. 11708 Page 8